apertium-hbo.hbo.lexd
# TODO: Hebrew order
# TODO: vowels might be wrong
אב:אָב <m>[im,hic]
אב:אָבִי <m>[iic]
בצע:בֶצַע <mf>[im]
עבד:עָבֶד <m>[im]
עבד:עֶבֶד <m>[im]
בהמה:בְהֵמָה <f>[ot]
בכרה:בְכֹרָה <f>[ot]
בכות:בָכוּת <f>[ot]
בעל:בָעַל <m>[im]
אבל:אֵבֶל <m>[im]
אבן:אָבֶנ <f>[ot]
בן:בֵנ <m>[im]
בקע:בֶקַע <m>[im]
בקעה:בִקְעָה <f>[ot]
בקר:בָקָר <mf>[im]
בקר:בֹקֶר <m>[im]
בר:בָר <m>[im]
באר:בְאֵר <f>[ot]
ברכה:בְרָכָה <f>[ot]
ברית:בְרִית <f>[ot]
בשׂר:בָשָׂר <m>[im]
בת:בַת <f>[ot]
בתולה:בְתוּלָה <f>[ot]
בטן:בָטֶנ <f>[ot]
בטח:בֶטַח <m>[im]
בית:בַיִת <m>[im,hic]
בית:בֵית <m>[im,iic]
צדקה:צְדָקָה <f>[ot]
עץ:עֵצ <m>[im]
צהר:צֹהַר <f>[ot]
עצם:עֶצֶמ <f>[ot]
צאן:צֹאנ <mf>[im]
צפון:צָפֹנָה <f>[ot]
צעקה:צְעָקָה <f>[ot]
צרי:צֳרִי <m>[im]
צחק:צְחֹק <m>[im]
ציד:צַיִד <m>[im]
ציד:צָיִ <m>[im]
צידה:צֵדָה <f>[ot]
עד:עַד <m>[im]
דבר:דָבָר <m>[im]
דבשׁ:דְבַשׁ <m>[im]
עד:עֵד <m>[im]
דגן:דָגָנ <m>[im]
אדם:אָדָמ <m>[im]
דם:דָמ <m>[im]
אדמה:אֲדָמָה <f>[ot]
עדנה:עֶדְנָה <f>[ot]
עדר:עֵדֶר <m>[im]
דרך:דֶרֶכְ <mf>[im]
דשׁא:דֶשֶׁא <m>[im]
גבור:גִבֹּר <m>[im]
גביר:גְבִיר <m>[im]
גדוד:גְדוּד <m>[im]
גל:גָל <m>[im]
עגלה:עֶגְלָה <f>[ot]
גן:גַנ <mf>[im]
גפן:גֶפֶנ <mf>[im]
גפר:גֹפֶר <m>[im]
גפרית:גָפְרִית <f>[ot]
גר:גֵר <m>[im]
גרם:גָרֶמ <m>[im]
גוי:גוֹי <m>[im]
אהל:אֹהֶל <m>[im]
הר:הֶרָה <m>[im]
כהן:כֹהֵנ <m>[im]
כלה:כָלָה <f>[ot]
כל:כֹל <m>[im]
אכל:אֹכֶל <m>[im]
כנף:כָנָפ <f>[ot]
כנור:כִנּוֹר <m>[im]
כרם:כָרֶמ <mf>[im]
כסף:כָסֶפ <m>[im]
כסף:כֶסֶפ <m>[im]
לבנה:לִבְנֶה <m>[im]
אל:אֵל <m>[im]
אלה:אָלָה <f>[ot]
עלה:עֹלָה <f>[ot]
אלמנה:אַלְמָנָה <f>[ot]
אלף:אֶלֶפ <mf>[im]
אלוף:אַלּוּפ <m>[im]
לחם:לָחֶמ <mf>[im]
לחם:לֶחֶמ <mf>[im]
לילה:לַיְלָה <m>[im]
לילה:לָיְלָה <m>[im]
עם:עַמ <m>[im]
עם:עָמ <m>[im] # Dir/LR
מבול:מַבּוּל <m>[im]
מצבה:מַצֵּבָה <f>[ot]
מצער:מִצְעָר <m>[im]
מאד:מְאֹד <m>[im]
אם:אֵמ <f>[ot]
מגן:מָגֵנ <mf>[im]
אמה:אַמָּה <f>[ot]
מאה:מֵאָה <f>[ot]
מהר:מֹהַר <m>[im]
מאכל:מַאֲכָל <m>[im]
מלך:מֶלֶכְ <m>[im]
מלח:מֶלַח <m>[im]
מלחמה:מִלְחָמָה <f>[ot]
מנוחה:מְנֻחָה <f>[ot]
מנוח:מָנוֹחַ <m>[im]
מנחה:מִנְחָה <f>[ot]
מקנה:מִקְנֶה <m>[im]
מקום:מָקוֹמ <m>[im]
מראה:מַרְאֶה <m>[im]
מרעה:מִרְעֶה <m>[im]
מריבה:מְרִיבָה <f>[ot]
אמשׁ:אָמֶשׁ <m>[im]
אמשׁ:אֶמֶשׁ <m>[im]
משׁגה:מִשְׁגֶּה <m>[im]
משׁמר:מִשְׁמָר <m>[im]
משׁנה:מִשְׁנֶה <m>[im]
משׁפט:מִשְׁפָּט <m>[im]
משׁקה:מַשְׁקֶה <m>[im]
משׁתה:מִשְׁתֶּה <m>[im]
מספד:מִסְפֵּד <m>[im]
מספר:מִסְפָּר <m>[im]
מספוא:מִסְפּוֹא <m>[im]
מעשׂר:מַעֲשֵׂר <m>[im]
אמת:אֱמֶת <f>[ot]
מעט:מְעַט <m>[im]
מטמן:מַטְמוֹנ <m>[im]
מאומה:מְאוּמָּה <f>[ot]
מאומה:מְאוּמָה <f>[ot]
מחר:מָחָר <m>[im]
מזבח:מִזְבֵּחַ <m>[im]
נבלה:נְבָלָה <f>[ot]
נביא:נָבִיא <m>[im]
נדר:נֶדֶר <m>[im]
נכר:נֵכָר <m>[im]
נכאת:נְכֹאת <f>[ot]
נעל:נַעַל <f>[ot]
ענן:עָנָנ <m>[im]
נפשׁ:נָפֶשׁ <f>[ot]
נפשׁ:נֶפֶשׁ <f>[ot]
נער:נַעַר <m>[im]
נסך:נֶסֶכְ <m>[im]
נחשׁ:נָחָשׁ <m>[im]
נחשׁת:נְחֹשֶׁת <f>[ot]
נזיד:נָזִיד <m>[im]
אפה:אֹפֶה <m>[im]
פלגשׁ:פִילֶגֶשׁ <f>[ot]
עפר:עָפָר <m>[im]
פרץ:פָרֶצ <m>[im]
פרעה:פַרְעֹה <m>[im]
פרת:פֹרָת <f>[ot]
פרי:פְרִי <m>[im]
פחז:פַחַז <m>[im]
עקב:עָקֵב <m>[im]
קבר:קָבֶר <m>[im]
קבר:קֶבֶר <m>[im]
קדם:קֶדֶמ <m>[im]
קדם:קֵדְמָה <m>[im]
קדים:קָדִימ <m>[im]
קללה:קְלָלָה <f>[ot]
קמח:קֶמַח <m>[im]
קשׁת:קַּשָׁת <m>[im]
קשׁת:קֶשֶׁת <f>[ot]
קשׂיטה:קְשִׂיטָה <f>[ot]
ערב:עָרֶב <m>[im]
רבבה:רְבָבָה <f>[ot]
ערב:עֶרֶב <m>[im]
רעב:רָעָב <m>[im]
ערבון:עֵרָבוֹנ <m>[im]
ארץ:אַרְצָה <f>[im]
ארץ:אָרְצָה <f>[im]
ארץ:אֶרֶצ <f>[im]
רעה:רָעָה <f>[ot]
רכב:רֶכֶב <m>[im]
ערלה:עָרְלָה <f>[ot]
רמשׂ:רֶמֶשׂ <m>[im]
רקיע:רָקִיעַ <m>[im]
ראשׁ:רֹאשׁ <m>[im]
רוח:רוּחַ <mf>[im]
רחם:רֶחֶמ <m>[im]
ארח:אֹרַח <m>[im]
ריב:רִיב <m>[im]
אריה:אַרְיֵה <m>[im]
ראי:רֳאִי <m>[im]
שׂבע:שָׂבָע <m>[im]
עשׂב:עֵשֶׂב <m>[im]
סביב:סָבִיב <mf>[im]
שׂדה:שָׂדֶה <m>[im]
שׁבר:שֶׁבֶר <m>[im]
שׁבט:שֵׁבֶט <m>[im]
שׂהדו:שָׂהֲדוּתָא <f>[ot]
אשׁ:אֵשׁ <mf>[im]
שׂה:שֶׂה <mf>[im]
אשׁה:אִשָּׁה <f>[hic]
אשׁה:אֵשֶׁת <f>[iic]
אשׁה:נָשׁ <f>[im,plonly]
שׁכם:שְׁכֶמ <m>[im]
אשׁל:אֶשֶׁל <m>[im]
שׁלל:שָׁלָל <m>[im]
שׁלשׁום:שִׁלְשֹׁמ <m>[im]
שׁלשׁום:שִׁלְשׁוֹמ <m>[im]
שׁלום:שָׁלוֹמ <m>[im]
אשׁם:אָשָׁמ <m>[im]
שׁם:שֵׁמ <m>[im]
שׁמן:שֶׁמֶנ <m>[im]
עשׁן:עָשָׁנ <m>[im]
שׁנה:שָׁנָה <f>[im]
שׁני:שָׁנִי <m>[im]
שׁפר:שָׁפֶר <m>[im]
שׁפחה:שִׁפְחָה <f>[ot]
שׁפיפן:שְׁפִיפֹנ <m>[im]
שׁקל:שֶׁקֶל <m>[im]
שׁארית:שְׁאֵרִית <f>[ot]
שׁשׁ:שֵׁשׁ <m>[im]
שׁשׁ:שִּׁשָׁה <f>[ot]
שׁאול:שְׁאֹלָה <mf>[im]
שׁאול:שְׁאוֹלָה <mf>[im]
שׁור:שׁוֹר <m>[im]
שׁור:שׁוּר <m>[im]
סלם:סֻלָּמ <m>[im]
סלת:סֹלֶת <f>[ot]
שׂמאל:שְׂמֹאל <m>[im]
שׂפה:שָׂפָה <f>[ot]
שׂק:שַׂק <m>[im]
שׂער:שֵׂעָר <m>[im]
שׂאת:שְׂאֵת <f>[ot]
אסון:אָסוֹנ <m>[im]
עשׂור:עָשׂוֹר <m>[im]
סוס:סוּס <m>[im]
תבן:תֶבֶנ <m>[im]
תהום:תְהוֹמ <f>[ot]
תהו:תֹהוּ <m>[im]
תאנה:תְאֵנָה <f>[ot]
תרדמה:תַרְדֵּמָה <f>[ot]
תאר:תֹאַר <m>[im]
תועבה:תוֹעֵבָה <f>[ot]
תאוה:תַאֲוָה <f>[ot]
תחת:תָחַת <m>[im]
טבח:טֶבַח <m>[im]
טרם:טֶרֶמ <mf>[im]
טריפה:טְרֵפָה <f>[ot]
טובה:טוֹבָה <f>[ot]
עוד:עֹד <m>[im]
עוד:עוֹד <m>[im]
ולד:וָלָד <m>[im]
עולם:עוֹלָמ <m>[im]
עוף:עוֹפ <m>[im]
אור:אוֹר <mf>[im]
עור:עוֹר <m>[im]
אות:אוֹת <mf>[im]
אח:אָח <m>[im,hic]
אח:אָח{cons}\ִי <m>[iic]
חלק:חֵלֶק <m>[im]
חלום:חֲלוֹמ <m>[im]
חמאה:חֶמְאָה <f>[ot]
חמר:חֵמָר <m>[im]
חמס:חָמָס <m>[im]
חמישׁית:חֲמִישִׁית <f>[ot]
חן:חֵנ <m>[im]
חק:חֹק <m>[im]
אחר:אַחַר <m>[im]
חרב:חָרֶב <f>[ot]
חרב:חֹרֶב <m>[im]
חרדה:חֲרָדָה <f>[ot]
חרפה:חֶרְפָּה <f>[ot]
חרישׁ:חָרִישׁ <m>[im]
חרי:חֹרִי <m>[im]
חסד:חָסֶד <m>[im]
חסד:חֶסֶד <m>[im]
חשׁכה:חֲשֵׁכָה <f>[ot]
חתן:חָתָנ <m>[im]
חטאה:חֲטָאָה <f>[ot]
חטאת:חַטָּאת <f>[ot]
אחור:אָחוֹר <m>[im]
חיה:חַיָּה <f>[ot]
חיל:חַיִל <m>[im]
אחזה:אֲחֻזָּה <f>[ot]
יד:יָד <mf>[im]
איל:אַיִל <m>[im]
אילה:אַיָּלָה <f>[ot]
אימה:אֵימָה <f>[ot]
ים:יַמ <m>[im]
ימין:יָמִינ <f>[ot]
עין:עָיִנ <f>[ot]
אין:אַיִנ <m>[im]
עיר:עִיר <f>[ot]
ירק:יֶרֶק <m>[im]
אישׁ:אִישׁ <m>[im]
ישׁ:יֵשׁ <mf>[im]
ישׁ:יֶשׁ <mf>[im]
יום:יוֹמ <m>[im]
יין:יַיִנ <m>[im]
יין:יָיִנ <m>[im]
עז:עָז <m>[im]
זבד:זֵבֶד <m>[im]
זבח:זֶבַח <m>[im]
זאב:זְאֵב <m>[im]
זהב:זָהָב <m>[im]
עזר:עֵזֶר <m>[im]
זרע:זָרַע <m>[im]
זרע:זֶרַע <m>[im]
זית:זַיִת <m>[im]

LEXICON ProperNoun(2)
אברהם:אַבְרָהָמ <m>
אברם:אַבְרָמ <m>
אהרן:אַהֲרֹנ <m>
יוחנן:יוֹחָנָנ <m>
יוסף:יוֹסֵפ <m>
יעקב:יַעֲקֹב <m>
יצחק:יִצְחָק <m>
לבן:לָבָנ <m>
משׁה:מֹשֶׁה <m>
נח:נֹחַ <m>
פולוס:פוֹלוֹס <m>
פטרוס:פֶטְרוֹס <m>
עשׂו:עֵשָׂו <m>





יהוה:יְהוָֹה <m>
יהוה:יְהוָה <m>



ישׁוע:יֵשׁוּעַ <m>



# TODO: Heבrew order

אבימאל:אֲבִימָאֵל <m>
אבימלך:אֲבִימֶּלֶכְ <m>
אבימלך:אֲבִימֶלֶכְ <m>
אברהם:אַבְרָהָמ <m>
אברם:אַבְרָמ <m>
עדה:עָדָה <f>
אדם:אָדָמ <m>
אדמה:אַדְמָה <mf>
אדני:אֲדֹנָי <m>
אשׁר:אָשֵׁר <mf>
אהליבמה:אָהֳלִיבָמָה <f>
עכבור:עַכְבּוֹר <m>
אלמודד:אַלְמוֹדָד <m>
עלוה:עַלְוָה <mf>
עלון:עַלְוָנ <m>
עמלק:עֲמָלֵק <mf>
עמרה:עֲמֹרָה <mf>
עמון:עַמּוֹנ <mf>
אמרפל:אַמְרָפֶל <m>
ענה:עֲנָה <m>
ענר:עָנֵר <m>
ארם:אֲרָמ <mf>
אררט:אֲרָרָט <mf>
ארפכשׁד:אַרְפַּכְשַׁד <m>
ארפכשׁד:אַרְפַּכְשָׁד <m>
אריוך:אַרְיוֹכְ <m>
שׁבע:שָּׁבַע <mf>
שׁבע:שָׁבַע <mf>
שׁדי:שַׁדַּי <m>
אשׁכנז:אַשְׁכֲּנַז <mf>
שׁלח:שָׁלַח <m>
שׁלם:שָׁלֵמ <mf>
שׁלף:שָׁלֶפ <mf>
שׁמה:שַׁמָּה <m>
שׁוה:שָׁוֵה <mf>
שׁאול:שָׁאוּל <m>
אשׁור:אַּשׁוּרָה <mf>
אשׁור:אַּשׁוּר <mf>
שׂמלה:שַׂמְלָה <m>
אסנת:אָסְנַת <f>
שׂרה:שָׂרָה <f>
שׂרי:שָׂרַי <f>
שׂרי:שָׂרָי <f>
עוית:עֲוִית <mf>
עזה:עַזָּה <mf>
בבל:בָבֶל <mf>
בלע:בָלַע <m>
ברד:בָרֶד <mf>
בשׂמת:בָשְׂמַת <f>
בדד:בְדַד <m>
בלע:בֶלַע <m>
בלע:בֶלַע <mf>
ברע:בֶרַע <m>
בארי:בְאֵרִי <m>
בלהה:בִלְהָה <f>
בלהן:בִלְהָנ <m>
בנימן:בִנְיָמִנ <mf>
בנימן:בִנְיָמִינ <mf>
ברשׁע:בִרְשַׁע <m>
בעור:בְעוֹר <m>
בריעה:בְרִיעָה <m>
בתואל:בְתוּאֵל <m>
בוז:בוּז <m>
צבאים:צְבוֹיִמ <mf>
צבעון:צִבְעוֹנ <m>
צלה:צִלָּה <f>
צפיון:צִפְיוֹנ <m>
צידון:צִידֹנ <mf>
צער:צֹעֲרָה <mf>
צער:צֹעַר <mf>
צער:צוֹעַר <mf>
צחר:צֹחַר <m>
צפו:צְפוֹ <m>
דמשׂק:דַמֶּשֶׂק <mf>
דן:דָנ <mf>
דבורה:דְבֹרָה <f>
דדן:דְדָנ <mf>
דנהבה:דִנְהָבָה <mf>
דישׁון:דִשֹׁנ <m>
דקלה:דִקְלָה <m>
דישׁן:דִישָׁנ <m>
דינה:דִינָה <f>
דתן:דֹתָיְנָה <mf>
עשׂו:עֵשָׂו <m>
עבר:עֵבֶר <m>
אצר:אֵצֶר <m>
עדן:עֵדֶנ <mf>
אדום:אֱדוֹמ <mf>
עשׂק:עֵשֶׂק <mf>
אלה:אֵלָה <m>
אלסר:אֶלָּסָר <mf>
אלישׁה:אֱלִישָׁה <mf>
אליעזר:אֱלִיעֶזֶר <m>
אליפז:אֱלִיפַז <m>
אליפז:אֱלִיפָז <m>
אנושׁ:אֱנוֹשׁ <m>
אפרת:אֶפְרָתָה <f>
אפרת:אֶפְרָת <f>
אפרים:אֶפְרַיִמ <mf>
אפרים:אֶפְרָיִמ <mf>
עפרון:עֶפְרֹנ <m>
עפרון:עֶפְרוֹנ <m>
ערי:עֵרִי <m>
ער:עֵר <m>
שׁבע:שֶׁבַע <mf>
אשׁכל:אֶשְׁכֹּל <m>
שׁלה:שֵׁלָה <m>
שׁלח:שֶׁלַח <m>
שׁם:שֵׁמ <m>
שׁת:שֵׁת <m>
שׂעיר:שֵׂעִירָה <mf>
שׂעיר:שֵׂעִיר <mf>
אחי:אֵחִי <m>
עילם:עֵילָמ <mf>
אילון:אֵילֹנ <m>
אילון:אֵילוֹנ <m>
עינים:עֵינַיִמ <mf>
עיפה:עֵיפָה <mf>
גד:גָד <mf>
גלעד:גַלְעֵד <mf>
געתם:גַעְתָּמ <m>
גחם:גַחַמ <m>
גרא:גֵרָא <m>
גרשׁון:גֵרְשׁוֹנ <m>
גיחון:גִיחוֹנ <mf>
גשׁן:גֹשֶׁנ <mf>
גמר:גֹמֶר <m>
גשׁן:גֹשְׁנָה <mf>
גוים:גוֹיִמ <mf>
גרר:גְרָרָה <mf>
גרר:גְרָר <mf>
הבל:הָבֶל <m>
הדד:הֲדַד <m>
הדד:הֲדָד <m>
הדר:הֲדַר <m>
הדורם:הֲדוֹרָמ <m>
הגר:הָגָר <f>
הרן:הָרָנ <m>
הבל:הֶבֶל <m>
שׁבעה:שִׁבְעָה <mf>
שׁמעון:שִׁמְעוֹנ <mf>
שׁנאב:שִׁנְאָב <m>
שׁנער:שִׁנְעָר <mf>
שׁלו:שִׁילוֹ <mf>
שׂטנה:שִׂטְנָה <mf>
עירד:עִירָד <m>
עירם:עִירָמ <m>
כלח:כָלַח <mf>
כשׂדים:כַשְׂדִּימ <mf>
כדרלעמר:כְדָרְלָעֹמֶר <m>
כדרלעמר:כְדָר־לָעֹמֶר <m>
כדרלעמר:כְדָרְלָעֹמֶר <m>
כשׂד:כֶשֶׂד <m>
כנען:כְנַעַנ <mf>
כנען:כְנָעַנ <mf>
כושׁ:כוּשׁ <m>
לשׁע:לָשַׁע <mf>
לבן:לָבָנ <m>
למך:לָמֶכְ <m>
לאה:לֵאָה <f>
למך:לֶמֶכְ <m>
לוי:לֵוִי <mf>
לוטן:לוֹטָנ <m>
לוט:לוֹט <m>
לוז:לוּזָה <mf>
לוז:לוּז <mf>
מעכה:מַעֲכָה <mf>
מגדיאל:מַגְדִּיאֵל <m>
מהללאל:מַהֲלַלְאֵל <m>
מכיר:מָכִיר <mf>
ממרא:מַמְרֵא <m>
ממרא:מַמְרֵא <mf>
מטרד:מַטְרֵד <f>
מחלת:מָחֲלַת <f>
מחנים:מַחֲנָיִמ <mf>
מדן:מְדָנ <m>
מהיטבאל:מְהֵיטַבְאֵל <mf>
מבצר:מִבְצָר <m>
מצרים:מִצְרַיִמ <mf>
מצרים:מִצְרָיִמ <mf>
מצרים:מִצְרַיְמָה <mf>
מצרים:מִצְרָיְמָה <mf>
מדין:מִדְיָנ <mf>
מלכה:מִלְכָּה <f>
מזה:מִזָּה <m>
מנשׁה:מְנַשֶּׁה <mf>
מואב:מוֹאָב <mf>
מורה:מוֹרֶה <mf>
מתושׁאל:מְתוּשָׁאֵל <m>
מתושׁלח:מְתוּשָׁלַח <m>
מתושׁלח:מְתוּשֶׁלַח <m>
מפים:מֻפִּימ <m>
מחויאל:מְחוּיָאֵל <m>
נעמה:נַעֲמָה <f>
נפישׁ:נָפִישׁ <m>
נפתלי:נַפְתָּלִי <mf>
נחת:נַחַת <m>
נחור:נָחוֹר <m>
נביות:נְבָיֹת <mf>
נביות:נְבָיוֹת <mf>
נמרד:נִמְרֹד <m>
נינוה:נִינְוֵה <mf>
נוד:נוֹד <mf>
נח:נֹחַ <m>
אן:אֹנ <mf>
שׁובל:שׁוֹבָל <m>
עובל:עוֹבָל <m>
אומר:אוֹמָר <m>
אונן:אוֹנָנ <m>
אן:אוֹנ <mf>
אופיר:אוֹפִר <mf>
פלג:פָלֶג <m>
פארן:פָארָנ <mf>
פרץ:פָרֶצ <m>
פעו:פָעוּ <mf>
פלג:פֶלֶג <m>
פרץ:פֶרֶצ <m>
פלדשׁ:פִלְדָּשׁ <m>
פינן:פִינֹנ <m>
פישׁון:פִישׁוֹנ <mf>
פניאל:פְנִיאֵל <mf>
פנואל:פְנוּאֵל <mf>
פוטיפר:פוֹטִיפַר <m>
פרת:פְרָת <mf>
קדשׁ:קָדֵשׁ <mf>
קין:קַיִנ <m>
קין:קָיִנ <m>
קינן:קֵינָנ <m>
קהת:קְהָת <m>
קריתים:קִרְיָתָיִמ <mf>
קמואל:קְמוּאֵל <m>
קנז:קְנַז <mf>
קרח:קֹרַח <m>
קטורה:קְטוּרָה <f>
רעמה:רַעְמָה <mf>
רעמסס:רַעְמְסֵס <mf>
רחל:רָחֵל <f>
רסן:רֶסֶנ <mf>
רבקה:רִבְקָה <f>
ראובן:רְאוּבֵנ <mf>
רעואל:רְעוּאֵל <m>
ראומה:רְאוּמָה <f>
רעו:רְעוּ <m>
רחבות:רְחֹבוֹת <mf>
סבא:סְבָא <mf>
סדם:סְדֹמָה <mf>
סדם:סְדֹמ <mf>
סרד:סֶרֶד <m>
שׁבא:שְׁבָא <mf>
שׁכם:שְׁכֶמָה <mf>
שׁכם:שְׁכֶמ <m>
שׁם:שֵׁמ <m>
שׁפו:שְׁפוֹ <m>
שׁוע:שׁוּעַ <m>
שׁוני:שׁוּנִי <m>
שׁור:שׁוּר <mf>
שׁוח:שׁוּחַ <m>
ספר:סְפָרָה <mf>
שׂרוג:שְׂרוּג <m>
סכות:סֻכֹּתָה <mf>
סכות:סֻכּוֹת <mf>
תבה:תֵבָה <m>
תמר:תָמָר <f>
תרח:תָרַח <m>
תחשׁ:תַחַשׁ <m>
תרח:תֶרַח <m>
תימן:תֵימָנ <mf>
תמנה:תִמְנָתָה <f>
תמנע:תִמְנָע <mf>
תולע:תוֹלָע <m>
טבח:טֶבַח <m>
עוץ:עוּצ <m>
אוזל:אוּזָל <m>
חצרמות:חֲצַרְמָוֶת <mf>
חדד:חֲדַד <m>
חמור:חֲמוֹר <m>
חם:חָמ <mf>
חנוך:חֲנוֹכְ <m>
חרן:חָרָנָה <mf>
חרן:חָרָנ <mf>
חוה:חַוָּה <f>
חוילה:חֲוִילָה <mf>
חזו:חֲזוֹ <m>
חבר:חֶבֶר <m>
חברון:חֶבְרוֹנ <mf>
חצרון:חֶצְרוֹנ <m>
חמדן:חֶמְדָּנ <m>
חת:חֵת <m>
חדקל:חִדֶּקֶל <mf>
חירה:חִירָה <m>
חרי:חֹרִי <m>
חובה:חוֹבָה <mf>
חשׁם:חֻשָׁמ <m>
יעקב:יַעֲקֹב <m>
יבל:יָבָל <m>
יבק:יַבֹּק <mf>
יעלם:יַעְלָמ <m>
יפת:יָפֶת <m>
יקשׁן:יָקְשָׁנ <m>
יקטן:יָקְטָנ <m>
ירח:יָרַח <m>
ירד:יָרֶד <m>
יון:יָוָנ <mf>
יחצאל:יַחְצְאֵל <m>
יהוה:יֱהוִה <m>
יפת:יֶפֶת <m>
ירד:יֶרֶד <m>
יהודה:יְהוּדָה <mf>
יהודית:יְהוּדִית <f>
ישׂשׂכר:יִשׂשָּׂכָר <mf>
יצחק:יִצְחָק <m>
ידלף:יִדְלָפ <m>
ימנה:יִמְנָה <m>
ישׁבק:יִשְׁבָּק <m>
ישׁמעאל:יִשְׁמָעֵאל <m>
יסכה:יִסְכָּה <f>
ישׂראל:יִשְׂרָאֵל <mf>
ימואל:יְמוּאֵל <m>
יובב:יוֹבָב <m>
יוסף:יוֹסֵפ <m>
יתת:יְתֵת <m>
יטור:יְטוּר <m>
יובל:יוּבָל <m>
יעושׁ:יְעוּשׁ <m>
זרח:זָרַח <m>
זבולן:זְבֻלוּנ <mf>
זבולן:זְבוּלֻנ <mf>
זרח:זֶרַח <m>
זלפה:זִלְפָּה <f>
זמרן:זִמְרָנ <m>

PATTERNS
ConjPrefix? Adjective

PATTERN Adjective
AdjectiveRoot [<adj><m><sg>:]
#AdjectiveRoot [<adj><f><sg>:] # TODO: which vowel?
AdjectiveRoot [<adj><m><pl>:>ִימ]
AdjectiveRoot [<adj><f><pl>:>וֹת]

LEXICON AdjectiveRoot
רב:רַב{.}
טוב:טוֹב

PATTERNS
ConjPrefix? [הנה<adv>:הִנֵּה]
ConjPrefix? [הנה<adv>:הִנּ] PrnSuf
